District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.30

Vehicle inspection officers.

(a)

Vehicle inspection officers shall undergo training on the rules and regulations governing private and public vehicles-for-hire and undergo yearly performance evaluations. Vehicle inspection officers shall be prohibited from making traffic stops of on-duty private or public vehicles-for-hire in the act of transporting a fare, unless there is reasonable suspicion of a violation, and shall act in accordance with all rules governing their duties, as established through rulemaking.

(b)

Upon reasonable suspicion of an illegal street hail, a public or private vehicle-for-hire operator shall provide a law enforcement official or vehicle inspection officer with access to a device containing an electronic record of trips sufficient to establish that the ride in question was prearranged through digital dispatch. Failure to have or provide access to a device containing such a record shall constitute a civil infraction punishable by fine or other penalty as established by the Mayor; provided, that an operator shall not be required to relinquish custody of a device containing evidence of a trip arranged through digital dispatch.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20k
as added Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(s), 59 DCR 9431
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 2(l), 61 DCR 12430
This section is referenced in § 50-301.07.
2001 Ed., § 50-329.01.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-184 added this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-197 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-197: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-197 provided, in part, that §§ 1, 2, 3, and 4 of the act shall apply as of March 10, 2015.